Hawaii statutes.
[PART
XVI.] CIVIL IDENTIFICATION CARDS

Note

L 2012, c 310, §10 provides:

"SECTION 10. To provide for the transition to issuance
of civil identification cards by the examiner of drivers, all valid and
unexpired civil identification cards issued by the department of the attorney
general up to and including December 31, 2012, shall remain valid for all
purposes until their stated expiration date."

Working group on documentation for state civil identification
card; reports to 2016-2017 legislature (dissolved on June 30, 2017). L 2015, c
243.

Revision Note

This part was enacted as subpart B to part VI but was
renumbered as part XVI pursuant to §23G-15.

Throughout this part, "part" substituted for
"subpart" and "part VI and this part" substituted for
"part".

[§286-301] Issuance of
identification card or temporary card. (a) To obtain an identification
card from the examiner of drivers, an individual shall complete an application
pursuant to section 286-303.

(b) The examiner of drivers, upon receipt of
the application by any individual who is a resident or a temporary resident of
this State, shall issue an identification card to that individual upon receipt
of any appropriate fee established pursuant to section 286-309.

(c) The identification card shall be similar
in size, shape, and design to a driver's license, but shall not entitle the
individual to whom it is issued to operate a motor vehicle.

(d) The issuance of an identification card
pursuant to this section shall not place upon the State of Hawaii or any agency
any liability for the misuse or the acceptance of the identification card as
valid identification, which shall be left entirely to the discretion of any
individual to whom such card is presented. [L 2012, c 310, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next